Utah statutes.
31A-22-1008.   Employer's breach of safety rules.
No condition in a workers' compensation policy requiring the insured employer
to comply with certain safety rules may excuse the workers' compensation
insurer from paying the required benefits to an employee injured as a result
of the employer's breach of a safety rule that is a condition to the workers'
compensation policy.   However, the insurer may bring a claim against the
insured employer for breach of the policy condition.
